Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1351. Experience rating and voluntary transfers of experience rating accounts.

Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, each eligible and deficit employer’s, except cost reimbursement employers, taxable wage rate shall be determined in the manner set forth in this subsection for each calendar year:

Each eligible employer shall be given an “experience factor” which shall be the ratio of excess of contributions over benefits paid on the employer’s account since December 31, 1939, to his average annual taxable payroll rounded to the next lower dollar amount for the four (4) fiscal years immediately preceding the computation date, except that when an employer first becomes eligible, his “experience factor” will be computed on his average annual taxable payroll for the two (2) fiscal years or more, but not to exceed four (4) fiscal years, immediately preceding the computation date. The computation of such “experience factor” shall be to six (6) decimal places.
(a)(i) Each eligible employer shall be given an “experience factor” which shall be the ratio of excess of contributions over benefits paid on the employer’s account since December 31, 1939, to his average annual taxable payroll rounded to the next lower dollar amount for the four (4) fiscal years immediately preceding the computation date, except that when an employer first becomes eligible, his “experience factor” will be computed on his average annual taxable payroll for the two (2) fiscal years or more, but not to exceed four (4) fiscal years, immediately preceding the computation date. The computation of such “experience factor” shall be to six (6) decimal places.

Each deficit employer shall be given a “deficit experience factor” which shall be the ratio of excess of benefits paid on the employer’s account over contributions since December 31, 1939, to his average annual taxable payroll rounded to the next lower dollar amount for one (1) or more fiscal years, but not to exceed four (4) fiscal years, for which he had covered employment ending on the computation date; provided, however, that any employer who, on any computation date has a “deficit experience factor” for the period immediately preceding such computation date but who has filed all reports, paid all contributions and penalties due on or before the cutoff date, and has during the last four (4) fiscal years paid contributions at a rate of not less than the standard rate applicable for each such year and in excess of benefits charged to his experience rating account during such years, shall have any balance of benefits charged to his account, which on the computation date immediately preceding such four (4) fiscal years was in excess of contributions paid, deleted from his account, and the excess benefits so deleted shall not be considered in the computation of his taxable wage rate for the rate years following such four (4) fiscal years. For the rate year following such computation date, he shall be given the standard rate for that year.

In the event an employer’s coverage has been terminated because he has ceased to do business or because he has not had covered employment for a period of four (4) years, and if said employer thereafter becomes a covered employer, he will be considered as though he were a new employer, and he shall not be credited with his previous experience under this chapter for the purpose of computing any future “experience factor.”

Benefits paid to a claimant whose employment terminated because the claimant’s employer was called to active military duty shall not be used as a factor in determining the taxable wage rate of that employer.

Schedules shall be prepared listing all eligible employers in inverse numerical order of their experience factors, and all deficit employers in numerical order of their deficit experience factors. There shall be listed on such schedules for each such employer in addition to the experience factor: (i) the amount of his taxable payroll for the fiscal year ending on the computation date, and (ii) a cumulative total consisting of the sum of such employer’s taxable payroll for the fiscal year ending on the computation date and the corresponding taxable payrolls for all other employers preceding him on such schedules.

The cumulative taxable payroll amounts listed on the schedules provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be segregated into groups whose limits shall be those set out in the table provided in section 72-1350(7), Idaho Code. Each of such groups shall be identified by the rate class number listed in the table which represents the percentage limits of each group. Each employer on the schedules shall be assigned a taxable wage rate in accordance with section 72-1350, Idaho Code.

If the grouping of rate classes requires the inclusion of exactly one-half (1/2) of an employer’s taxable payroll, the employer shall be assigned the lower of the two (2) rates designated for the two (2) classes in which the halves of his taxable payroll are so required.
(d)(i) If the grouping of rate classes requires the inclusion of exactly one-half (1/2) of an employer’s taxable payroll, the employer shall be assigned the lower of the two (2) rates designated for the two (2) classes in which the halves of his taxable payroll are so required.

If the group of rate classes requires the inclusion of a portion other than exactly one-half (1/2) of an employer’s taxable payroll, the employer shall be assigned the rate designated for the class in which the greater part of his taxable payroll is so required.

If one (1) or more employers on the schedules have experience factors identical to that of the last employer included in a particular rate class, all such employers shall be included in and assigned the taxable wage rate specified for such class, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection.

If the taxable payroll amount or the experience factor or both such taxable payroll amount and experience factor of any eligible or deficit employer listed on the schedules is changed, the employer shall be placed in that position on the schedules which he would have occupied had his taxable payroll amount and/or experience factor as changed been used in determining his position in the first instance, but such change shall not affect the position or rate classification of any other employer listed on the schedules and shall not affect the rate determination for previous years.

For experience rating purposes, all previously accumulated benefit charges to covered employers’ accounts, except cost reimbursement employers, shall not be changed except as provided in this chapter. Benefits paid prior to June 30 shall, as of June 30 of each year preceding the calendar year for which a covered employer’s taxable wage rate is effective, be charged to the account of the covered employer, except cost reimbursement employers, who paid the largest individual amount of base period wages as shown on the determination used as the basis for the payment of such benefits, except that no charge shall be made to the account of such covered employer with respect to benefits paid under the following situations:

If paid to a worker who terminated his services voluntarily without good cause attributable to such covered employer, with good cause but for reasons not attributable to such covered employer, or who had been discharged for misconduct in connection with such services;

If paid in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1368(10), Idaho Code, and the decision to pay benefits is subsequently reversed;

For that portion of benefits paid to multistate claimants pursuant to section 72-1344, Idaho Code, which exceeds the amount of benefits that would have been charged had only Idaho wages been used in paying the claim;

If paid in accordance with the extended benefit program triggered by either national or state indicators;

If paid to a worker who continues to perform services for such covered employer without a reduction in his customary work schedule, and who is eligible to receive benefits due to layoff or a reduction in earnings from another employer;

If paid to a worker who turns down an offer of suitable work because of participation in a job training program pursuant to the requirements of section 72-1366(8), Idaho Code.
(3) A covered employer whose experience rating account is chargeable, as prescribed by this section, is an interested party as defined in section 72-1323, Idaho Code. A determination of chargeability shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the department’s rules. Appeal proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

(4) An experience rating record shall be maintained for each covered employer. The record shall be credited with all contributions which the covered employer has paid for covered employment prior to the cutoff date, pursuant to the provisions of this and preceding acts, and which covered employment occurred prior to the computation date. The record shall also be charged with the amount of benefits paid which are chargeable to the covered employer’s account as provided by the appropriate provisions of the employment security law and regulations thereunder in effect at the time such benefits were paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant any covered employer or individual in his service a priority with respect to any claim or right because of amounts paid by such covered employer into the employment security fund.

(5)(a) Whenever any individual or type of organization, whether or not a covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, in any manner succeeds to, or acquires all or substantially all, of the business of an employer who at the time of acquisition was a covered employer, and in respect to whom the director finds that the business of the predecessor is continued solely by the successor, the separate experience rating account of the predecessor shall, upon the joint application of the predecessor and the successor within the one hundred eighty (180) days after such acquisition and approval by the director, be transferred to the successor employer for the purpose of determining such successor’s liability and taxable wage rate, and any successor who was not an employer on the date of acquisition shall, as of such date, become a covered employer as defined in this chapter. Such one hundred eighty (180) day period may be extended at the discretion of the director.

(b) Whenever any individual or type of organization, whether or not a covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, in any manner succeeds to, or acquires, part of the business of an employer who at the time of acquisition was a covered employer, and such portion of the business is continued by the successor, so much of the separate experience rating account of the predecessor as is attributable to the portion of the business transferred, as determined on a pro rata basis in the same ratio that the wages of covered employees properly allocable to the transferred portion of the business bears to the payroll of the predecessor in the last four (4) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the date of transfer, shall, upon the joint application of the predecessor and the successor within one hundred eighty (180) days after such acquisition and approval by the director, be transferred to the successor employer for the purpose of determining such successor’s liability and taxable wage rate, and any successor who was not an employer on the date of acquisition shall, as of such date, become a covered employer as defined in this chapter. Such one hundred eighty (180) day period may be extended at the discretion of the director.

(c)(i) If the successor was a covered employer prior to the date of the acquisition of all or a part of the predecessor’s business, his taxable wage rate, effective the first day of the calendar quarter immediately following the date of acquisition, shall be a newly computed rate based on the combined experience of the predecessor and successor, the resulting rate remaining in effect the balance of the rate year.
(ii) If the successor was not a covered employer prior to the date of the acquisition of all or a part of the predecessor’s business, his rate shall be the rate applicable to the predecessor with respect to the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition, but if there were more than one (1) predecessor, the successor’s rate shall be a newly computed rate based on the combined experience of the predecessors, becoming effective immediately after the date of acquisition, and shall remain in effect the balance of the rate year.

(d) For purposes of this section, an employer’s experience rating account shall consist of the actual contribution, benefit and taxable payroll experience of the employer and any amounts due from the employer under this chapter. When a transferred experience rating account includes amounts due from the employer under this chapter, both the predecessor employer and the successor employer shall be jointly and severally liable for those amounts.

§ 72-1351A. Mandatory transfers of experience rating accounts and federal conformity provisions regarding transfers of experience and assignment of rates.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following shall apply regarding transfers of experience and assignment of rates:

If a covered employer transfers its trade or business, or a portion thereof, to another employer, whether or not a covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management or control of the two (2) employers, then the experience rating account attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred to the employer to whom such business is so transferred. The rates of both employers shall be recalculated using the methods provided in section 72-1351(5)(b) and either (c)(i) or (c)(ii), Idaho Code. Whenever such mandatory transfer involves only a portion of the experience rating record, and the predecessor or successor employers fail within ten (10) days after notice to supply the required payroll information, the transfer may be based on estimates of the allocable payrolls.
(1)(a) If a covered employer transfers its trade or business, or a portion thereof, to another employer, whether or not a covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management or control of the two (2) employers, then the experience rating account attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred to the employer to whom such business is so transferred. The rates of both employers shall be recalculated using the methods provided in section 72-1351(5)(b) and either (c)(i) or (c)(ii), Idaho Code. Whenever such mandatory transfer involves only a portion of the experience rating record, and the predecessor or successor employers fail within ten (10) days after notice to supply the required payroll information, the transfer may be based on estimates of the allocable payrolls.

If, following a transfer of experience under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director determines that a substantial purpose of the transfer of the trade or business was to obtain a reduced liability for contributions, then the experience rating accounts of the employers involved shall be combined into a single account and a single rate shall be assigned to such account.

Whenever a person who is not a covered employer under this chapter at the time such person acquires the trade or business of a covered employer, the experience rating account of the acquired business shall not be transferred to such person if the director finds that such person acquired the business primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions. Instead, such person shall be assigned the standard rate for new employers under section 72-1350, Idaho Code. In determining whether the trade or business was acquired primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contributions, the director shall use objective factors which may include, but are not limited to, the cost of acquiring the business, whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how long such business enterprise was continued, or whether a substantial number of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition.

It shall be a violation of this section if a person:
(3)(a) It shall be a violation of this section if a person:

Makes any false statement to the department when the maker knows the statement to be false or acts with deliberate ignorance of or reckless disregard for the truth of the matter or willfully fails to disclose a material fact to the department in connection with the transfer of a trade or business;

Prepares any false or antedated report, form, book, paper, record, written instrument, or other matter or thing in connection with the transfer of a trade or business with the intent to submit it or allow it to be submitted to the department as genuine or true;

Knowingly violates or attempts to violate subsection (1) or (2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience rate; or

Knowingly advises another person in a way that results in a violation or an attempted violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience rate.
(b) If a person commits any of the acts described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the person shall be subject to the following penalties:

If the person is a covered employer, a civil money penalty of ten percent (10%) of such person’s taxable wages for the four (4) completed consecutive quarters preceding the violation shall be imposed for such year and said penalty shall be deposited in the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.

If the person is not a covered employer, such person shall be subject to a civil money penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Any such penalty shall be deposited in the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.

Every person who knowingly makes any false statement to the department or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to the department in connection with the transfer of a trade or business, or knowingly prepares any false or antedated report, form, book, paper, record, written instrument, or other matter or thing in connection with the transfer of a trade or business with the intent to submit it or allow it to be submitted to the department as genuine or true, or knowingly violates or attempts to violate subsection (1) or (2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience rate, or knowingly advises another person to act in a way that results in a violation or an attempted violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience rate, shall be guilty of a felony punishable as provided in section 18-112, Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section:

An employer’s experience rating account shall consist of the actual contribution, benefit and taxable payroll experience of the employer and any amounts due from the employer under this chapter. When a transferred experience rating account includes amounts due from the employer under this chapter, both the predecessor employer and the successor employer shall be jointly and severally liable for those amounts.

“Knowingly” means having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance of or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.

“Person” has the meaning given such term by section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. 7701(a)(1)).

A “transfer of a trade or business” occurs whenever a person in any manner acquires or succeeds to all or a portion of a trade or business. Factors the department may consider when determining whether a transfer of a trade or business has occurred include, but are not limited to, the following:

Whether the successor continued the business enterprise of the acquired business;

Whether the successor purchased, leased or assumed machinery and manufacturing equipment, office equipment, business premises, the business or corporate name, inventories, a covenant not to compete or a list of customers;

Continuity of business relationships with third parties such as vendors, suppliers and subcontractors;

A transfer of good will;

A transfer of accounts receivable;

Possession and use of the predecessor’s sales correspondence; and
(vii) Whether the employees remained the same.

“Trade or business” includes, but is not limited to, the employer’s workforce. The transfer of some or all of an employer’s workforce to another employer shall be considered a transfer of a trade or business when, as the result of such transfer, the transferring employer no longer performs trade or business with respect to the transferred workforce, and such trade or business is performed by the employer to whom the workforce is transferred.

“Violates or attempts to violate” includes, but is not limited to, intent to evade, misrepresentation or willful nondisclosure.

The director shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business for purposes of this section.

This section shall be interpreted and applied in such a manner as to meet the minimum requirements contained in any guidance or regulations issued by the United States department of labor.

Administrative determinations issued pursuant to this section shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed with the department in accordance with the department’s rules. Appeal proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1351B. Federal conformity provision prohibiting relief from liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an experience rated employer’s account may not be relieved of charges and a reimbursing employer may not be relieved of liability for benefits paid to a claimant that are subsequently determined to be overpaid if:

The covered employer or an agent of the covered employer is at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to the department’s written or electronic request for information relating to a claim for unemployment insurance benefits; and

The covered employer or agent of the covered employer has established a pattern of failing to timely or adequately respond.

A response is timely if the requested information is received by the department within seven (7) days from the date the request is mailed or sent electronically. This time limit may be extended by the department at its discretion upon a covered employer’s or agent of the covered employer’s written request.

A response is adequate if it provides sufficient facts to allow the department to make the correct determination. A response will not be considered inadequate if the department failed to ask for all necessary information.

A pattern of failure to respond timely or adequately means at least two (2) or more instances of such behavior. If a covered employer uses a third party agent to respond on its behalf, then a pattern may be established based upon that agent’s behavior with respect to the individual client or covered employer that agent represents.

A covered employer shall be notified in writing of the department’s determination, which shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1352. Period, termination, and election of employer coverage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, any employer who is or becomes a covered employer within any calendar year shall be deemed to be a covered employer until his coverage is terminated.

The coverage of any covered employer may be terminated if:

As of the close of any calendar quarter, it is found that such covered employer had no individuals performing services for him in covered employment, and that the continued operation of his trade, profession, or business is not likely to result in his having a quarterly payroll of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or more within the ensuing two (2) calendar quarters; or

As of the close of a calendar year, it is found that such covered employer did not pay or become liable to pay for services rendered to him in covered employment wages amounting to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or more in any calendar quarter of such year, and that the continued operation of his trade, profession, or business is not likely to create covered employment as defined in section 72-1316, Idaho Code, within the ensuing calendar year.

Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b), the coverage of an employer may not be terminated if he is or was subject under the provisions of the federal unemployment tax act during the current or preceding calendar year.

Any employer for whom services are performed in this state which do not constitute covered employment, may file with the director a written request that all such services shall be deemed to constitute covered employment. Upon approval by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute covered employment from the date stated in such approval for not less than two (2) calendar years. Such services shall cease to be covered employment as of January 1 of any calendar year subsequent to such two (2) calendar years, if not later than January 31 of such year either such employer has filed with the director a written notice of termination, or the director on his own motion, has given notice of termination of such coverage.

Benefits payable to the employees thus covered will be payable on the same basis and conditions that apply to all other covered employees.

§ 72-1352A. Corporate officers — Exemption from coverage — Notification — Reinstatement.

A corporation that is a public company, other than those covered in sections 72-1316A, 72-1322D and 72-1349C, Idaho Code, may elect to exempt from coverage pursuant to this chapter any bona fide corporate officer who is voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, is a shareholder of the corporation, exercises substantial control in the daily management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not include the performance of manual labor.

A corporation that is not a public company, other than those covered in sections 72-1316A, 72-1322D and 72-1349C, Idaho Code, may elect to exempt from coverage pursuant to this chapter any bona fide corporate officer, without regard to the corporate officer’s performance of manual labor, if the corporate officer is a shareholder of the corporation, voluntarily agrees to be exempted from coverage and exercises substantial control in the daily management of the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a “public company” is a corporation that has a class of shares registered with the federal securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the securities and exchange act of 1934 or section 8 of the investment company act of 1940, or any successor statute.

To make the election, a corporation with qualifying corporate officers pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section must register with the department each qualifying corporate officer it elects to exempt from coverage. The registration must be in a format prescribed by the department and be signed and dated by the corporate officer being exempted from coverage. Registration forms received and approved by the department by March 31 of the first year of the election shall be effective January 1 of that year and shall remain in effect for at least two (2) consecutive calendar years.

A newly formed corporation with qualifying corporate officers pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall register with the department each corporate officer it elects to exempt within forty-five (45) calendar days after submitting its Idaho business registration form to the department as required by section 72-1337, Idaho Code. The registration must be in a format prescribed by the department and be signed and dated by the corporate officer being exempted from coverage. Registration forms received and approved by the department shall become effective as of the date the Idaho business registration form was submitted to the department and shall remain in effect for at least two (2) consecutive calendar years.

A corporation may elect to reinstate coverage for one (1) or more corporate officers previously exempted pursuant to this section. Reinstatement requires written notice from the corporation to the department in a format prescribed by the department. Reinstatement requests received by the department on or before December 15 shall become effective the first day of the calendar year following the end of the exemption’s two (2) year effective date. Coverage shall not be reinstated retroactively.

§ 72-1353. Administrative determinations of coverage.

The director may, upon his own motion or upon application of any employer, make findings of fact and on the basis thereof determine whether such employer is a covered employer and whether services performed for or in connection with the business of such employer constitute covered employment. The determination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed with the department setting forth the grounds for such appeal. Proceedings on appeal shall be had in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

In making any determination with respect to whether the services performed by a worker are performed in covered employment, the director may, on the basis of the available evidence, determine that other workers performing similar services for the employer are similarly situated with respect to the coverage of said services under the provision of this chapter, and that such services constitute covered employment.

In any proceeding to determine whether an employer is a covered employer or whether services are performed in covered employment, it shall be the burden of the employer to prove that the employer is not a covered employer, that services were not performed in covered employment, or that workers are not similarly situated with respect to the coverage of their services.

§ 72-1354. Penalty on unpaid amounts.

If any amounts due under this chapter are not paid by any covered employer on or before the date on which they are due, such amounts shall bear penalty at the rate of four percent (4%) or twenty dollars ($20.00), whichever is the larger, for each month or fraction thereof until paid; provided, that in no case shall the penalty exceed the actual amounts due. The date of payment shall be deemed the date of actual receipt by the director, or if mailed, the date of mailing. Penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code. At the discretion of the director, the department may compromise the amount of penalty collected pursuant to this section if the employer shows he had good cause for failing to timely pay contributions.

§ 72-1355. Collection by suit.

Civil actions in the district court may be brought to collect any amount due under the employment security law of this state or any other state or the federal government in the same manner provided by law for collection of debt. Any person found liable for any amount due under this chapter shall pay the costs of such action. No proceeding or action shall be maintained and no writ or process shall be issued by any court which has the purpose or effect of delaying the collection of any amounts due under this chapter or substituting any collection procedure for those prescribed in this chapter.

Any person who fails to comply with section 72-1349 or 72-1349A, Idaho Code, for a period of thirty (30) days or more may be enjoined by the district court of any county in which such person does business from carrying on his business while such delinquency continues.

All proceedings in the courts are to be brought by the director in the name of the state of Idaho.

§ 72-1355A. Contractors’ and principals’ liability for contributions.

No covered employer which contracts with any contractor or subcontractor who is a covered employer under the provisions of this chapter shall make final payment to such contractor or subcontractor for any indebtedness due, until after the contractor or subcontractor has paid or has furnished a good and sufficient bond acceptable to the director for payment of contributions due, or to become due, in respect to personal services which have been performed by individuals for such contractor or subcontractor. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall render said covered employer directly liable for such contributions; and the director shall have all of the remedies of collection against said covered employer under the provisions of this chapter as though the services in question were performed directly for said covered employer.

§ 72-1356. Priorities.

Where the assets of an employer subject to the provisions of this chapter are distributed by an order of court under Idaho law, including any receivership, assignment for the benefit of creditors, adjudication of insolvency, composition, administration of estates of decedents, or similar proceeding, amounts then or thereafter due under this chapter must be paid in full prior to all other unsecured claims except taxes, claims arising under the worker’s compensation act, and claims for wages of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to each claimant earned within four (4) months of the commencement of proceedings. In the case of such an employer’s adjudication of bankruptcy, judicially confirmed extension proposal or composition under the bankruptcy law, amounts then or thereafter due under this chapter are entitled to such priority as is now or may hereafter be granted under 11 U.S.C. 507.

§ 72-1357. Adjustments and refunds.

If any person shall make application for a refund or credit of any amounts paid under this chapter, the director shall, upon determining that such amounts or any portion thereof was erroneously collected, either allow credit therefor, without interest, in connection with subsequent payments, or shall refund from the fund in which the erroneous payment was deposited, without interest, the amount erroneously paid.

No refund or credit shall be allowed unless an application therefor is made on or before whichever of the following dates is later:

One (1) year from the date on which such payment was made; or

Three (3) years from the last day of the calendar quarter with respect to which such payment was made. For a like cause and within the same period a refund may be so made, or credit allowed, on the initiative of the director. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any refund or credit of moneys due and payable under the law and regulations in effect at the time such moneys were paid.

In the event that any application for refund or credit is rejected in whole or in part, a written notice of rejection shall be forwarded to the applicant. Within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, the applicant may appeal to the director for a hearing with regard to the rejection, setting forth the grounds for such appeal. Proceedings on the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1358. Determination of amounts due upon failure to report.

If any covered employer fails to file a report when due under this chapter, or if such report when filed is incorrect or insufficient, the director may, on the basis of available information, determine the amount of wages paid in covered employment during the periods with respect to which the reports were or should have been made and the amount due under this chapter from the employer. The determination shall become final unless the employer, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, files an appeal with the department. Proceedings on the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1359. Jeopardy assessments.

If the director determines that the collection of any amounts due from any covered employer under the provisions of this chapter will be jeopardized by delay, he may, whether or not the time prescribed by this chapter or any rules issued pursuant thereto for making reports and payments has expired, determine, on the basis of available information, the wages paid by such employer for covered employment and declare the amount due thereon immediately payable, and shall give written notice of such declaration to such employer. Any amounts, including penalty and interest, that are contained in such written declaration shall be subject to immediate seizure pursuant to section 72-1360A, Idaho Code, as well as through any other collection procedures allowed under law. Such jeopardy assessment shall become conclusive and binding upon the employer unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, the employer files an appeal to the department setting forth grounds for such appeal. In such cases, the right of appeal shall be conditioned upon the payment of the amount declared to be due, less any amount already collected, or upon giving appropriate security to the director for the payment thereof. Proceedings on such appeals shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

Section 18 of S.L. 2005, ch. 5 provided that the act should take effect on and after July 1, 2005.
CASE NOTES